District of Columbia statutes.
3-1311

Budget.

The Board shall submit to the Mayor a consolidated budget covering all anticipated income, expenses (including all start-up costs), and capital outlays of the District of Columbia Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board, which budget shall show the net amount for which it requests an appropriation during its 1st year of operation. Said budget shall be submitted on the date that all District government agencies are required to submit their budgets to the Mayor. The Mayor shall transmit to the Council the budget as requested by the Board. The Mayor may also submit such modified budget as he deems appropriate. The net amount for which the Board requests an appropriation shall be the difference between the anticipated expenses for the coming fiscal year, including debt service for capital expenses and a reserve for bad debts, as shown in the consolidated budget, and the anticipated income shown in that budget. Said appropriation shall be in the form of 1 lump-sum amount and shall be transferred to the Board. The Board shall, upon final determination of the amount of such appropriation by the Council, support such amount in all further budgetary deliberations.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
1981 Ed., § 2-2511.